Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-194
Package; label; contents.

Except as otherwise provided in the Weights and Measures Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, any package kept for sale or sold shall bear on the outside of the package a definite, plain, and conspicuous declaration of:

(1) The identity of the commodity in the package unless the same can easily be identified through the wrapper or container;

(2) The quantity of contents in terms of weight, measure, or count. When items are combined to form a distinctive product, the quantity representation may be in terms of the total quantity of the combined product and a quantity representation need not be made for each item, except that if the label lists the ingredients they shall be in the order of their predominance by weight; and

(3) The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor in the case of any package kept for sale or sold in any place other than on the premises where packaged.

Laws 1972, LB 1413, § 12;

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 23.